apertium-la-en.la.dix
    <pardef n="agricol/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="Poetic">
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="Older form">
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arum</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="comet/es__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arum</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>es<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- Second Declension -->
    <pardef n="mur/us__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orum</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="agricola"><i>agricol</i><par n="agricol/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="auriga"><i>aurig</i><par n="agricol/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="incola"><i>incol</i><par n="agricol/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nauta"><i>naut</i><par n="agricol/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="poeta"><i>poet</i><par n="agricol/a__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="propheta"><i>prophet</i><par n="agricol/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pirata"><i>pirat</i><par n="agricol/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scriba"><i>scrib</i><par n="agricol/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Romanus"><i>Roman</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="abavus"><i>abav</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="abortivus"><i>abortiv</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="abyssus"><i>abyss</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="acervus"><i>acerv</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="aduentus"><i>aduent</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="adversarius"><i>adversari</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="aestus"><i>aest</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="alumnus"><i>alumn</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="alveus"><i>alve</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ambitus"><i>ambit</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="amiculus"><i>amicul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="amicus"><i>amic</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="amplexus"><i>amplex</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="angelus"><i>angel</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="angulus"><i>angul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="animus"><i>anim</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="annus"><i>ann</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="apostolus"><i>apostol</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="apparatus"><i>apparat</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="appetitus"><i>appetit</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="aquilus"><i>aquil</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="architectus"><i>architect</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="arcus"><i>arc</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="articulus"><i>articul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="asinus"><i>asin</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="atavus"><i>atav</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="auctus"><i>auct</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="autus"><i>aut</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="avus"><i>av</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="baculus"><i>bacul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="baiulus"><i>baiul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="balanus"><i>balan</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="barbarus"><i>barbar</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="calculus"><i>calcul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="caminus"><i>camin</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="canonus"><i>canon</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="capillus"><i>capill</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="catechumenus"><i>catechumen</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="cellarius"><i>cellari</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="christus"><i>christ</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="colonus"><i>colon</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="deus"><i>de</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="digitus"><i>digit</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="dominus"><i>domin</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="equus"><i>equ</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="famulus"><i>famul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="fructus"><i>fruct</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="haereticus"><i>haeretic</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="humerus"><i>humer</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="inimicus"><i>inimic</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="laqueus"><i>laque</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="legionarius"><i>legionari</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ludus"><i>lud</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="mendicus"><i>mendic</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="monachus"><i>monach</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="mundus"><i>mund</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="numerus"><i>numer</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="oculus"><i>ocul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="orbus"><i>orb</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="presbyterus"><i>presbyter</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="reus"><i>re</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="scholasticus"><i>scholastic</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="servus"><i>serv</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="spiritus"><i>spirit</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="stomachus"><i>stomach</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="tumbarius"><i>tumbari</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="tumulus"><i>tumul</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="tyrannus"><i>tyrann</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="uterus"><i>uter</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="venaticus"><i>venatic</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="ventus"><i>vent</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="vicinus"><i>vicin</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="virtus"><i>virt</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="vulnus"><i>vuln</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
    <e a="agfl-lat" lm="vultus"><i>vult</i><par n="mur/us__n"/></e>
